District of Columbia statutes.
6-208

Exemption from court fees and costs.

(a)

The Authority and any Officer acting therefor shall not be required to pay court costs, filing fees, or any other fees in any court in and for the District.

(b)

Neither the Authority nor any Officer acting in his or her official capacity for the Authority shall be required to give a bond or enter into an undertaking to perfect an appeal or to obtain an injunction or other writ, process, or order in or of any court in the District for which a bond or undertaking is required by law or rule of court.

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 9, 47 DCR 1325

History

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 6-201.

Emergency Legislation